Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.125

Fees.

The department shall charge fees for issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of all certificates, endorsements, licenses, and permits and for examinations required by this chapter. The department shall set the fees by rule.

The fees shall cover the full cost of issuing the certificates and permits, devising and administering the examinations, and administering and enforcing this chapter. The costs shall include travel, per diem, and administrative support costs.

[ 2020 c 153 s 13; 1983 c 124 s 17.]